Utah statutes.
78A-2-110.   Data bases for judicial boards.
(1)  As used in this section, "judicial board" means any judicial branch
board, commission, council, committee, working group, task force, study group,
advisory group, or other body with a defined limited membership that is
created to operate for more than six months by the constitution, by statute,
by judicial order, by any justice or judge, by the Judicial Council, or by the
state court administrator, a district court administrator, trial court
executive, or by any clerk or administrator in the judicial branch of state
government.
(2)  The Judicial Council shall designate a person from its staff to maintain
a computerized data base containing information about all judicial boards.
(3)  The person designated to maintain the data base shall ensure that the
data base contains:
(a)  the name of the judicial board;
(b)  the statutory or constitutional authority for the creation of the
judicial board;
(c)  the court or other judicial entity under whose jurisdiction the judicial
board operates or with which the judicial board is affiliated, if any;
(d)  the name, address, gender, telephone number, and county of each person
currently serving on the judicial board, along with a notation of all vacant
or unfilled positions;
(e)  the title of the position held by the person who appointed each member of
the judicial board;
(f)  the length of the term to which each member of the judicial board was
appointed and the month and year that each judicial board member's term
expires;
(g)  the organization, interest group, profession, local government entity, or
geographic area that the member of the judicial board represents, if any;
(h)  whether or not the judicial board allocates state or federal funds and
the amount of those funds allocated during the last fiscal year;
(i)  whether the judicial board is a policy board or an advisory board;
(j)  whether or not the judicial board has or exercises rulemaking authority;
and
(k)  any compensation and expense reimbursement that members of the executive
board are authorized to receive.
(4)  The person designated to maintain the data base shall:
(a)  make the information contained in the data base available to the public
upon request; and
(b)  cooperate with other entities of state government to publish the data or
useful summaries of the data.
(5) (a)  The person designated to maintain the data bases shall prepare,
publish, and distribute an annual report by April 1 of each year that
includes, as of March 1 of that year:
(i)  the total number of judicial boards;
(ii)  the name of each of those judicial boards and the court, council,
administrator, executive, or clerk under whose jurisdiction the executive
board operates or with which the judicial board is affiliated, if any;
(iii)  for each court, council, administrator, executive, or clerk, the total
number of judicial boards under the jurisdiction of or affiliated with that
court, council, administrator, executive, or clerk;
(iv)  the total number of members for each of those judicial boards;
(v)  whether each board is a policymaking board or an advisory board and the
total number of policy boards and the total number of advisory boards; and
(vi)  the compensation, if any, paid to the members of each of those judicial
boards.
(b)  The person designated to maintain the data bases shall distribute copies
of the report to:
(i)  the chief justice of the Utah Supreme Court;
(ii)  the state court administrator;
(iii)  the governor;
(iv)  the president of the Utah Senate;
(v)  the speaker of the Utah House;
(vi)  the Office of Legislative Research and General Counsel; and
(vii)  any other persons who request a copy of the annual report.
